Maryland, session 2025, HB1506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
6–101.
(a) The legislative body of a municipality may provide that violations of
ordinances and resolutions authorized by this division are punishable as misdemeanors.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1506*

HOUSE BILL 1506
(b) A penalty for a violation of an ordinance or resolution that is declared to be a
misdemeanor under this section may not exceed imprisonment for 6 months or a fine of
[$1,000] $5,000 or both.
(c) Sections 7–504 and 7–505 of the Courts Article shall govern imprisonment in
default of fines and costs.
6–102.
(a) (1) Unless State law classifies a violation as a criminal offense, the
legislative body of a municipality may provide, by law, that a violation of a municipal
ordinance is a municipal infraction.
(2) A municipal infraction is a civil offense.
(b) The legislative body of a municipality may classify as a municipal infraction:
(1) a violation of an ordinance or regulation concerning zoning or land use;
and
(2) littering in the municipality as prohibited under § 10–110 of the
Criminal Law Article.
(c) (1) A fine not exceeding [$1,000] $5,000 may be imposed for each
municipal infraction.
(2) The fine is payable to the municipality by the person charged in the
citation within 20 calendar days of service of the citation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.